Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1731
Documentation; remedy of defects.

If the documentation received by the department does not conform to the requirements of section 43-1730, the department shall remedy any defect which it can without the assistance of the requesting agency or person. If the department is unable to make such corrections, the requesting agency or person shall immediately be notified of the necessary additions or corrections. In neither case shall the original documentation be returned. The department and the receiving court shall accept the documentation required by section 43-1730 even if it is not in the usual form required by state or local law or rules so long as the substantive requirements of such section are met.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 51.